Illinois, session 104th, HB1465.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Human Rights Act is amended by 5changing Section 2-109 as follows: 6    (775 ILCS 5/2-109)7    Sec. 2-109. Sexual harassment prevention training.8    (A) The General Assembly finds that the organizational 9tolerance of sexual harassment has a detrimental influence in 10workplaces by creating a hostile environment for employees, 11reducing productivity, and increasing legal liability. It is 12the General Assembly's intent to encourage employers to adopt 13and actively implement policies to ensure their workplaces are 14safe for employees to report concerns about sexual harassment 15without fear of retaliation, loss of status, or loss of 16promotional opportunities.17    (B) The Department shall produce a model sexual harassment 18prevention training program aimed at the prevention of sexual 19harassment in the workplace. The model program shall be made 20available to employers and to the public online at no cost. 21This model program shall include, at a minimum, the following:22        (1) an explanation of sexual harassment consistent 23    with this Act;  HB1465- 2 -LRB104 03216 JRC 13237 b1        (2) examples of conduct that constitutes unlawful 2    sexual harassment;3        (3) a summary of relevant federal and State statutory 4    provisions concerning sexual harassment, including 5    remedies available to victims of sexual harassment; and6        (4) a summary of responsibilities of employers in the 7    prevention, investigation, and corrective measures of 8    sexual harassment.9    (C) Except for those employers subject to the requirements 10of Section 5-10.5 of the State Officials and Employees Ethics 11Act, every employer with employees working in this State shall 12use the model sexual harassment prevention training program 13created by the Department or establish its own sexual 14harassment prevention training program that equals or exceeds 15the minimum standards in subsection (B). The sexual harassment 16prevention training shall be provided at least once a year to 17all employees. For the purposes of satisfying the requirements 18under this Section, the Department's model sexual harassment 19prevention training program may be used to supplement any 20existing program an employer is utilizing or develops. An 21employer is not required to provide sexual harassment 22prevention training for a trade union worker if the worker has 23participated in a sexual harassment prevention training 24program under subsection (C-5). 25    (C-5) A trade union shall provide sexual harassment 26prevention training for its workers in this State. Any trade   HB1465- 3 -LRB104 03216 JRC 13237 b1union providing sexual harassment prevention training shall 2use the model sexual harassment prevention training program 3created by the Department or establish its own sexual 4harassment prevention training program that equals or exceeds 5the minimum standards in subsection (B). The sexual harassment 6prevention training shall be provided at least once a year to 7all workers and the trade union shall maintain a log 8indicating each worker's yearly training status. A worker is 9not required to participate in a sexual harassment prevention 10training program under subsection (C) each time the worker is 11hired for a new job if the worker has already participated in a 12sexual harassment prevention training program during that 13calendar year.14    (D) If an employer violates this Section, the Department 15shall issue a notice to show cause giving the employer 30 days 16to comply. If the employer does not comply within 30 days, the 17Department shall petition the Human Rights Commission for 18entry of an order imposing a civil penalty against the 19employer pursuant to Section 8-109.1. The civil penalty shall 20be paid into the Department of Human Rights Training and 21Development Fund.22(Source: P.A. 101-221, eff. 1-1-20.)